Utah statutes.
53A-11-1211.   Violations -- Investigations -- School responses.

(1)  A school shall investigate any report or allegation that an authorized curricular or noncurricular club is:

(a)  participating in activities beyond the scope of its purpose; or

(b)  in violation of a provision of this part or another applicable law, rule, regulation, or policy.

(2)  After meeting with the faculty sponsor, faculty supervisor, or faculty monitor, the students involved, and the person making the report or allegation, if a violation is substantiated, the school may do any of the following:

(a)  allow the club's original statement of its purpose, goals, and activities to be modified to include the activities if they are in compliance with the provisions of this part and other applicable laws, rules, regulations, or policies;

(b)  instruct the faculty sponsor, supervisor, or monitor not to allow similar violations in the future;

(c)  limit or suspend the club's authorization or school facilities use pending further corrective action as determined by the school; or

(d)  terminate the club's authorization and dissolve the club.

(3)  Any limitation on expression, practice, or conduct of any student, advisor, or guest in a meeting of a curricular or noncurricular club, or limitation on school facilities use, shall be by the least restrictive means necessary to satisfy the school's interests as identified in this part.

(4)  A club that has been terminated in accordance with Subsection (2)(d) may not reapply for authorization until the following school year.

(5)  A student who makes a false allegation or report under this section shall be subject to school discipline.

